Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1305
Cooperative corporation; fees, filings, and reports.

The fees for the incorporation of cooperative companies shall be the same as those required by law of other corporations. Such cooperative corporations shall be required to make the same reports and filings as is required of other corporations.

Laws 1911, c. 32, § 5, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 737;

Laws 1921, c. 28, § 4, p. 162;

C.S.1922, § 645;

C.S.1929, § 24-1304;

R.S.1943, § 21-1305.